Maine, session 132, LD1294.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-SS, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ, §6,
is further amended to read:
1. Resident taxpayer; tax years beginning before 2026 2025. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2018 and before January 1, 2026 2025, a resident
individual is allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under this Part equal to $300
for each qualifying child and dependent of the taxpayer for whom the taxpayer was eligible
to claim the federal child tax credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for the same taxable
year.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5219-SS, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ,
§6, is amended to read:
1-A. Resident taxpayer; tax years beginning 2026 2025 or after. For tax years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026 2025, a resident individual is allowed a credit against
the tax otherwise due under this Part equal to $300 for each dependent of the taxpayer for
whom the taxpayer was eligible to claim the federal personal exemption pursuant to the
Code, Section 151 in an amount greater than $0 for the same taxable year. in the following
amounts:
A. $300 for each dependent of the taxpayer who is 6 years of age or older; and
B. $600 for each dependent of the taxpayer who has not attained 6 years of age before
the close of the taxable year.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5219-SS, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. ZZZ, §6,
is further amended to read:
4. Refundability; phase-out. For tax years beginning before January 1, 2024, the
credit allowed by this section may not reduce the tax otherwise due under this Part to less
than zero. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the credit allowed under
subsections 1, 1‑A, 3 and 3‑A is refundable. The For the tax year beginning on January 1,
2024, the amount of the credit allowed by this section must be reduced, but not below zero,
by $7.50 for each $1,000 or fraction thereof by which the taxpayer's Maine adjusted gross
income exceeds $400,000 in the case of a joint return and $200,000 in any other case. For
tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the amount of the credit allowed by this
section must be reduced, but not below zero, by $20 for each $500 or fraction thereof by
which the taxpayer's Maine adjusted gross income exceeds:
A. For a single individual or a married individual filing a separate return, $100,000;
B. For an individual filing as a head of household, $125,000; and
C. For individuals filing married joint returns or surviving spouses, $150,000.